Connecticut, session 2026, SB00086.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 4-67p of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
3 (a) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
4 designate an employee of the Office of Policy and Management to serve
5 as Chief Data Officer. The Chief Data Officer shall be responsible for (1)
6 directing executive branch agencies on the use and management of data
7 to enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of state programs and
8 policies, (2) facilitating the sharing and use of executive branch agency
9 data (A) between executive branch agencies, and (B) with the public, (3)
10 coordinating data analytics and transparency master planning for
11 executive branch agencies, and (4) creating the state data plan in
12 accordance with subsection (c) of this section. The Chief Data Officer
13 shall carry out the responsibilities set forth in subdivisions (1) to (3),
14 inclusive, of this subsection in accordance with the state data plan
15 created pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
16 (b) Each executive branch agency shall designate an employee of the
17 agency to serve as the agency data officer, who shall be responsible for
18 implementing the provisions of this section and who shall serve as the
LCO 1 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
19 main contact person for inquiries, requests or concerns regarding access
20 to the data of such agency. The agency data officer, in consultation with
21 the Chief Data Officer and the executive agency head, shall establish
22 procedures to ensure that requests for data that the agency receives are
23 complied with in an appropriate and prompt manner.
24 (c) Not later than December 31, 2018, and every two years thereafter,
25 the Chief Data Officer, in consultation with the agency data officers and
26 executive branch agency heads, shall create a state data plan. The state
27 data plan shall (1) establish management and data analysis standards
28 across all executive branch agencies, (2) include specific, achievable
29 goals within the two years following adoption of such plan, as well as
30 longer term goals, (3) make recommendations to enhance
31 standardization and integration of data systems and data management
32 practices across all executive branch agencies, (4) provide a timeline for
33 a review of any state or federal legal concerns or other obstacles to the
34 internal sharing of data among agencies, including security and privacy
35 concerns, and (5) set goals for improving the online repository
36 established pursuant to subsection (i) of this section. Each state data
37 plan shall provide for a procedure for each agency head to report to the
38 Chief Data Officer regarding the agency's progress toward achieving the
39 plan's goals. Such plan may make recommendations concerning data
40 management for the legislative or judicial branch agencies, but such
41 recommendations shall not be binding on such agencies.
42 (d) The Chief Data Officer shall submit a preliminary draft of such
43 plan to the Connecticut Data Analysis Technology Advisory Board
44 established under section 2-79e not later than November 1, 2018, and
45 every two years thereafter. Said board shall hold a public hearing on
46 such draft and shall submit any suggested revisions to the Chief Data
47 Officer not later than thirty days after receipt of such draft.
48 (e) After the public hearing and if applicable, receiving any
49 recommended revisions from the board, the Chief Data Officer shall
50 finalize such plan and submit the final plan to the board. The Chief Data
51 Officer shall send a copy of the final state data plan to all agency data
LCO 2 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
52 officers and shall post such plan on the Internet web site of the Office of
53 Policy and Management.
54 (f) Information technology-related actions and initiatives of all
55 executive branch agencies, including, but not limited to, the acquisition
56 of hardware and software and the development of software, shall be
57 consistent with the final state data plan.
58 (g) On or before December 31, 2018, and not less than annually
59 thereafter, each executive branch agency shall conduct an inventory of
60 any high value data that is collected or possessed by the agency. Such
61 inventory shall be in a form prescribed by the Chief Data Officer. In
62 conducting such inventory, data shall be presumed to be public data
63 unless otherwise classified by federal or state law or regulation. On or
64 before December 31, 2018, and not less than annually thereafter, each
65 executive branch agency shall submit such inventory to the Chief Data
66 Officer and the Connecticut Data Analysis Technology Advisory Board.
67 (h) Each executive branch agency shall develop an open data access
68 plan. Such plan shall be in a form prescribed by the Office of Policy and
69 Management and shall detail the agency's plan to publish, as open data,
70 any public data that the agency has identified and any protected data
71 that can be made public through aggregation, redaction of individually
72 identifiable information or other means sufficient to satisfy applicable
73 state or federal law or regulation.
74 (i) The Office of Policy and Management shall operate and maintain
75 an online repository for the publication of open data by executive
76 branch agencies.
77 (j) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Chief Data Officer, in
78 consultation with the agency data officers designated pursuant to
79 subsection (b) of this section, shall review the inventory of all high value
80 data collected or possessed by executive branch agencies pursuant to
81 subsection (g) of this section to identify and publish any data that could
82 be useful for artificial intelligence systems, machine learning and other
83 statistical means of data analysis to create economic opportunity and
LCO 3 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
84 support state economic development goals, through private businesses,
85 nonprofit organizations and other entities that will use such data,
86 consistent with all applicable laws and regulations. The Chief Data
87 Officer and agency data officers shall:
88 (1) Identify appropriate data to make available for use by artificial
89 intelligence systems, machine learning and other statistical means of
90 data analysis;
91 (2) Develop policies and procedures for data quality and data
92 governance to ensure data are appropriate for the intended purpose and
93 do not lead to any unlawful discrimination or disparate impact, as
94 described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of
95 section 51-10e;
96 (3) Determine any necessary aggregation, redaction of individually
97 identifiable information or application of other techniques required to
98 ensure and preserve privacy and to satisfy all applicable state or federal
99 laws and regulations for the public disclosure of data; and
100 (4) Determine the procedures through which agencies shall make any
101 such data available via publication on the online repository established
102 pursuant to subsection (i) of this section.
103 [(j)] (k) Any state agency that is not an executive branch agency and
104 any quasi-public agency or municipality may voluntarily opt to comply
105 with the provisions of this section and, upon submission of written
106 notice of the agency's or municipality's decision to the Office of Policy
107 and Management, the provisions of this section shall apply to such
108 agency or municipality. Any state or quasi-public agency or any
109 municipality that voluntarily opts to comply with the provisions of this
110 section may opt out of complying with this section upon submission of
111 written notice of the agency's or municipality's decision to the Office of
112 Policy and Management. The Office of Policy and Management shall
113 create and maintain a list of all agencies subject to the provisions of this
114 section, including those agencies and municipalities that have
115 voluntarily opted to comply, and shall publish such list on the office's
LCO 4 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
116 Internet web site and update such list as necessary.
117 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2027) The Commissioner of Economic and
118 Community Development, in consultation with the Banking
119 Commissioner, Commissioner of Administrative Services,
120 Commissioner of Public Health and Insurance Commissioner, shall
121 develop a plan to establish an artificial intelligence regulatory sandbox
122 program, which program shall allow an applicant to temporarily test an
123 innovative product or service on a limited basis under reduced
124 licensure, regulatory and other legal requirements than may otherwise
125 be required under the laws of the state. Such plan shall be developed for
126 the purpose of establishing a competitive business environment in the
127 state for the development and deployment of artificial intelligence
128 technologies relative to other jurisdictions. Not later than January 1,
129 2028, the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development
130 shall submit recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of
131 section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the Governor and the joint
132 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
133 matters relating to commerce, banking, insurance and public health for
134 any legislation necessary to implement such plan.
135 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
136 (1) "Artificial intelligence system" (A) means a machine-learning-
137 based system that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from
138 inputs how to generate outputs, such as content, decisions, predictions
139 or recommendations, capable of influencing physical or virtual
140 environments, and (B) does not include any rules-based or deterministic
141 software system, data analytics tool or scripted decision tree;
142 (2) "Companion chatbot" (A) means an artificial intelligence system
143 with a natural language interface that (i) provides adaptive, human-like
144 responses to user inputs, and (ii) is capable of meeting a user's social
145 needs by, among other things, exhibiting anthropomorphic features and
146 having the ability to sustain a relationship across multiple interactions,
147 and (B) does not include any chatbot that (i) is used solely for (I) any
LCO 5 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
148 purpose related to a business's internal operations concerning, for
149 example, productivity, source information analysis, research or
150 technical assistance, or (II) customer service, shopping or product
151 discovery, or (ii) is a feature of a video game, provided such chatbot (I)
152 can only maintain a dialogue concerning topics related to the video
153 game, and (II) cannot maintain a dialogue concerning mental health,
154 self-harm or sexually explicit conduct;
155 (3) "Companion chatbot platform" means a platform that allows a
156 user to engage with a companion chatbot;
157 (4) "Minor" means an individual who is younger than eighteen years
158 of age;
159 (5) "Operator" means a person who makes a companion chatbot
160 platform available to a user;
161 (6) "Person" means an individual, association, corporation, limited
162 liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity;
163 (7) "Sexually explicit conduct" has the same meaning as provided in
164 18 USC 2256, as amended from time to time;
165 (8) "User" means an individual who uses a companion chatbot while
166 the individual is physically present in the state; and
167 (9) "Video game" means a game that is played on an electronic
168 amusement device that (A) utilizes a computer, microprocessor or
169 similar electronic circuitry, (B) either utilizes an integrated monitor or is
170 designed to be used with a television set or a computer monitor, and (C)
171 interacts with the user of such device.
172 (b) If an operator makes a companion chatbot platform available to a
173 user and the companion chatbot platform allows the user to engage with
174 a companion chatbot that would mislead a reasonable person to believe
175 that the person is interacting with a human, the operator shall issue a
176 clear and conspicuous notice to such user disclosing that the companion
177 chatbot is artificial and not human.
LCO 6 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
178 (c) Each operator shall:
179 (1) Prevent each companion chatbot such operator makes available
180 on its companion chatbot platform from engaging with users, unless
181 such operator (A) establishes and maintains a protocol to (i) prevent
182 such companion chatbot from providing to users any content
183 concerning suicidal ideation, suicide or self-harm, and (ii) on the basis
184 of evidence-based methods for measuring suicidal ideation or intention
185 to engage in self-harm, refer a user to a crisis service provider, including,
186 but not limited to, by way of a suicide hotline or crisis text line, if the
187 user expresses to such companion chatbot any suicidal ideation or
188 intention to engage in self-harm, (B) publishes a description of the
189 protocol established and maintained pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
190 this subdivision at a publicly accessible location on such operator's
191 Internet web site, and (C) discloses to each user of such companion
192 chatbot that companion chatbots may not be suitable for certain minors;
193 (2) For each user of a companion chatbot such operator makes
194 available on its companion chatbot platform who such operator knows
195 to be a minor, (A) disclose to such user that such user is interacting with
196 an artificial intelligence system, (B) notify such user, in a clear and
197 conspicuous manner and not less frequently than once following each
198 three-hour period of continuous interaction between such user and the
199 companion chatbot, (i) that such user is interacting with an artificial
200 intelligence system, and (ii) to take a break from using such companion
201 chatbot, and (C) institute reasonable measures to prevent the
202 companion chatbot from (i) providing to such user a visual depiction of
203 any sexually explicit conduct, or (ii) directly stating to such user that
204 such user should engage in any sexually explicit conduct; and
205 (3) (A) Not later than February 1, 2028, and annually thereafter,
206 prepare and submit a report to the Attorney General, in a form and
207 manner prescribed by the Attorney General, disclosing the following
208 information for the immediately preceding calendar year:
209 (i) The protocols established and maintained by such operator
LCO 7 of 8

Substitute Bill No. 86
210 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
211 (ii) The number of times such operator referred a user to a crisis
212 service provider as set forth in subparagraph (A)(ii) of subdivision (1)
213 of this subsection.
214 (B) No report submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to
215 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall include (i) any information
216 other than the information required under subparagraph (A) of this
217 subdivision, or (ii) any personal data, as defined in section 42-515 of the
218 general statutes.
219 (d) The Attorney General shall post each report submitted to the
220 Attorney General pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of
221 subsection (c) of this section on the Attorney General's Internet web site.
222 (e) Any violation of subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall constitute
223 an unfair trade practice for purposes of section 42-110b of the general
224 statutes and shall be enforced solely by the Attorney General. The
225 provisions of section 42-110g of the general statutes shall not apply to
226 any such violation. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
227 providing the basis for a private right of action for any violation of
228 subsection (b) or (c) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2027 4-67p
Sec. 2 July 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 New section
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 8 of 8